Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-622
Society emblems; unlawful use; penalty.

Any person who shall willfully wear, exhibit, display, print or use, for any purpose, the badge, motto, button, decoration, charm, emblem, rosette, or other insignia of any such association or organization mentioned in section 21-617, duly registered hereunder, unless he or she shall be entitled to use and wear the same under the constitution and bylaws, rules and regulations of such association or organization, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 140, § 6, p. 497;

C.S.1929, § 24-619;

R.S.1943, § 21-622;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 77.